th: ป้ายทะเบียนรถ Frame เพลท มาตรฐาน: มาตรฐานออสเตรเลีย (372 x 134 มม.); มาตรฐาน EU (520 x 110 มม.); มาตรฐานญี่ปุ่น; ป้ายทะเบียนมอเตอร์ไซค์; สหรัฐอเมริกา/แคนาดา (12 x 6 นิ้ว); อื่นๆ
en: Vehicle license plate frame plate standard: Australia standard (372 x 134 mm); EU standard (520 x 110 mm); Japan standard; Motorcycle plate; US/Canada (12 x 6 in); Other
de: Standard des Kennzeichenrahmens: Australien-Standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-Standard (520 x 110 mm); Japan-Standard; Motorradkennzeichen; USA/Kanada (12 x 6 Zoll); Sonstiges
hr-HR: Standard okvira registarske pločice vozila: Australski standard (372 x 134 mm); Standard EU-a (520 x 110 mm); Japanski standard; Tablica za motocikl; SAD/Kanada (12 x 6 in); Ostalo
ja: 車両用ライセンスプレートフレーム対応規格: オーストラリア規格 (372 x 134 mm); EU 規格 (520 x 110 mm); 日本規格; オートバイ用ナンバープレート; 米国/カナダ (12 x 6 インチ); その他
cs: Standard rozměru registrační značky: Australský standard (372 × 134 mm); Standard EU (520 × 110 mm); Japonský standard; Značka pro motocykly; USA/Kanada (12 × 6 palců); Jiné
sk-SK: Štandardný rámček na evidenčné číslo vozidla: Austrálsky štandard (372 x 134 mm); Štandard EÚ (520 x 110 mm); Japonský štandard; Značka na motocykel; USA/Kanada (12 x 6 in); Iné
zh-CN: 车牌框适配标准: 澳大利亚标准 (372 x 134 mm); 欧盟标准 (520 x 110 mm); 日本标准; 摩托车车牌; 美国/加拿大 (12 x 6 英寸); 其他
fi: Ajoneuvon rekisterikilven kehys vakiomallinen: Australian standardi (372 × 134 mm); EU-standardi (520 × 110 mm); Japanin standardi; Moottoripyörän kilpi; Yhdysvallat/Kanada (12 × 6 in); Muu
ko: 차량 번호판 프레임 호환 번호판 규격: 호주 표준(372 x 134mm); EU 표준(520 x 110mm); 일본 표준; 오토바이 번호판; 미국/캐나다(12 x 6인치); 기타
zh-TW: 車牌框車牌標準: 澳洲標準 (372 x 134 公釐); 歐盟標準 (520 x 110 公釐); 日本標準; 機車車牌; 美加標準 (12 x 6 吋); 其他
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės valstybinio numerio rėmelio numerio standarto tipas: Australijos standartas (372 x 134 mm); ES standartas (520 x 110 mm); Japonijos standartas; Motociklo numeris; JAV / Kanados standartas (12 x 6 col.); Kita
sv: Standard för ram till fordonsregistreringsskylt: Australisk standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard; Motorcykelskylt; USA/Kanada (12 x 6 tum); Övrigt
ru: Стандарт номерного знака для рамки: Стандарт Австралии (372 x 134 мм); Стандарт ЕС (520 x 110 мм); Стандарт Японии; Номерной знак для мотоцикла; США/Канада (12 x 6 дюймов); Другое
pt-PT: Norma da placa de matrícula do veículo: Padrão da Austrália (372 x 134 mm); Padrão da UE (520 x 110 mm); Padrão do Japão; Matrícula de moto; EUA/Canadá (12 x 6 pol.); Outro
it: Standard della piastra del telaio della targa del veicolo: Standard Australia (372 x 134 mm); Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard Giappone; Targa per moto; USA/Canada (12 x 6 pollici); Altro
vi: Khung biển số xe tiêu chuẩn: Tiêu chuẩn Úc (372 x 134 mm); Tiêu chuẩn EU (520 x 110 mm); Tiêu chuẩn Nhật Bản; Biển số xe máy; Mỹ/Canada (12 x 6 in); Khác
fr: Norme de plaque compatible avec le cadre de plaque d’immatriculation: Standard australien (372 x 134 mm); Standard européen (520 x 110 mm); Standard japonais; Plaque de moto; États-Unis/Canada (12 x 6 po); Autre
pl: Standard tablicy rejestracyjnej dla ramki: Standard australijski (372 x 134 mm); Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard japoński; Tablica motocyklowa; USA/Kanada (12 x 6 cali); Inne
nb: Rammeplatestandard for kjøretøysnummerskilt: Australsk standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard; Motorsykkelskilt; USA/Canada (12 x 6 tommer); Annet
hu: Jármű rendszámtábla Frame szabvány: Ausztrál szabvány (372 x 134 mm); EU szabvány (520 x 110 mm); Japán szabvány; Motorkerékpár-rendszámtábla; USA / Kanada (12 x 6 hüvelyk); Egyéb
da: Pladestandard for nummerpladeramme: Australsk standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard; Motorcykelnummerplade; USA/Canada (12 x 6 in); Andet
es: Marco estándar para la placa de identificación del vehículo: Estándar de Australia (372 x 134 mm); Estándar de la UE (520 x 110 mm); Estándar de Japón; Placa de motocicleta; EE. UU./Canadá (12 x 6 pulgadas); Otro
pt-BR: Moldura de placa veicular padrão da placa: Padrão da Austrália (372 x 134 mm); Padrão da UE (520 x 110 mm); Padrão do Japão; Placa de motocicleta; EUA/Canadá (12 x 6 pol.); Outro
sl-SI: Standard tablice za okvir registrske tablice vozila: Avstralski standard (372 x 134 mm); EU standard (520 x 110 mm); Japonski standard; Registrska tablica za motorno kolo; ZDA/Kanada (12 x 6 palcev); Drugo
nl: Voertuigkentekenplaathouder kentekenstandaard: Australische standaard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standaard (520 x 110 mm); Japanse standaard; Motorfietskentekenplaat; VS/Canada (12 x 6 inch); Overig
el: Πρότυπο πλάκας πλαισίου πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας οχήματος: Πρότυπο Αυστραλίας (372 x 134 mm); Πρότυπο ΕΕ (520 x 110 mm); Πρότυπο Ιαπωνίας; Πινακίδα μοτοσικλέτας; ΗΠΑ/Καναδά (12 x 6 in); Άλλο
ro-RO: Standardul plăcii suportului plăcuței de înmatriculare auto: Standard Australia (372 x 134 mm); Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard Japonia; Plăcuță pentru motociclete; SUA/Canada (12 x 6 in); Altele
bg-BG: Стандарт на табелата за рамката за регистрационен номер на превозно средство: Австралийски стандарт (372 x 134 мм); Стандарт за ЕС (520 x 110 мм); Японски стандарт; Табела за мотоциклет; САЩ/Канада (12 x 6 инча); Друго
tr: Araç plaka çerçevesi plaka standardı: Avustralya standart (372 x 134 mm); AB standart (520 x 110 mm); Japonya standart; Motosiklet plakası; ABD/Kanada (12 x 6 inç); Diğer